Utah statutes.
48-2c-1309.   Deposit with state treasurer.

Assets of a dissolved company that should be transferred to a creditor, claimant, or member of the company who cannot be found shall be reduced to cash and deposited with the state treasurer in accordance with Title 67, Chapter 4a, Unclaimed Property Act.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

